Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Corporate Finance.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides:

“(a)
AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.390

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, apply to a distribution to shareholders made after July 1, 1989 by a corporation existing on July 1, 1989, but a distribution under a contract for the purchase or redemption of shares entered into by the corporation before July 1, 1989 may be made if permissible under
AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.390

or under the provisions of former AS 10.05 and other law in effect at the time the contract was formed.

“(b)
AS

10.06.338(a)

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, applies only to shares required on or after July 1, 1989.”

Sec. 10.06.305.
Issuance of and requirements for shares.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, a corporation may issue one or more classes or series of shares or both, with full, limited, or no voting rights and with other rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions as are stated or authorized in its articles of incorporation. A denial or limitation of voting rights is not effective unless at the time one or more classes or series of outstanding shares or debt securities, singly or in the aggregate, are entitled to full voting rights. A denial or limitation of dividend or liquidation rights is not effective unless at the time one or more classes or series of outstanding shares, singly or in the aggregate, are entitled to unlimited dividend or liquidation rights.

All shares of a class shall have the same voting, conversion, and redemption rights and other rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions, unless the class is divided into series. If a class is divided into series, all the shares of a series shall have the same voting, conversion, and redemption rights and other rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.308.
Issuance of preferred or special classes of shares.

If authorized by the articles of incorporation, a corporation may issue preferred or special classes of shares

subject to redemption as provided under AS

10.06.325

;

entitling the holders to cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative dividends;

having preferences over another class or classes of shares for the payment of dividends;

having preference in the assets of the corporation over another class of shares upon the voluntary or involuntary liquidation of the corporation;

convertible into shares of another class or into shares of a series of the same or another class, except a class having prior or superior rights and preferences as to dividends or distribution of assets upon liquidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2000)

Sec. 10.06.310.
Issuance of shares in series.

If authorized by the articles of incorporation, the shares of a preferred or special class may be divided into and issued in series. Each series shall be designated to distinguish the shares of the series from the shares of other series and classes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.313.
Variation in rights and preferences of shares.

Any or all of the rights and preferences of a series of a preferred or special class of shares and the variations in the relative rights and preferences between different series may be fixed and determined by the articles of incorporation, but shares of the same class shall be identical except for the following relative rights and preferences as to which there may be variations between series:

the rate of dividend;

the price and the terms and conditions on which shares may be redeemed;

the amount payable upon shares in the event of involuntary liquidation;

the amount payable upon shares in the event of voluntary liquidation;

sinking fund provisions for the redemption or purchase of shares;

the terms and conditions on which shares may be converted, if the shares of a series are issued with the privilege of conversion;

voting rights, if any.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.315.
Series rights and preferences established by board.

If the articles of incorporation expressly vest authority in the board, then, to the extent that the articles have not established series and fixed and determined the variations in the relative rights and preferences between series, the board may divide a class into series and, within the limitations set out in AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.323

and in the articles, fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of the shares of a series.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.318.
Manner of establishing series.

If the authority to establish a series is contained in the articles of incorporation, the board shall adopt a resolution setting out the designation of the series and fixing and determining the relative rights and preferences of the series to the extent not fixed and determined by the articles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.320.
Filing of statement before issuance of class or series.

Before the issuance of shares of a class the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions of which have been fixed by resolution of the board, or before the issuance of shares of a series established by resolution of the board, the corporation shall file with the commissioner a statement, and an exact copy of the statement, signed by the president or vice-president and the secretary or assistant secretary, setting out

the name of the corporation;

a copy of the resolution determining the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions of the wholly unissued class, or of the resolution establishing and designating a series, and fixing and determining the relative rights and preferences of the series;

the date of the adoption of the resolution;

that the resolution was adopted by the board.

The commissioner shall process the statement in accordance with AS

10.06.910

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.323.
Effect of filing statement.

When the commissioner has filed the statement under AS

10.06.320

, the resolution fixing the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions of a wholly unissued class of shares or the resolution establishing and designating a series of shares and fixing and determining the relative rights and preferences of the series becomes effective and constitutes an amendment of the articles of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.325.
Redemption of shares; creation of sinking fund; repurchase agreements.

A corporation may provide in the articles of incorporation for one or more classes or series of

common shares that are redeemable, in whole or in part,

at the option of the corporation; or

to the extent and upon the happening of one or more specified events;

preferred shares that are redeemable, in whole or in part,

at the option of the corporation;

to the extent and upon the happening of one or more specified events;

at the option of the holder; or

upon the vote of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of the class or series to be redeemed.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, an open-end investment company registered under the United States Investment Company Act of 1940 may, if its articles of incorporation so provide, issue shares that are redeemable at the option of the holder at a price approximately equal to the shares’ proportionate interest in the net assets of the corporation, and a shareholder may compel redemption of the shares in accordance with their terms.

Nothing in this section prevents a corporation from creating a sinking fund or similar provision or entering into an agreement for the redemption or purchase of its shares to the extent permitted by this chapter.

Except as provided by AS

10.06.385

, a redemption of shares shall be made at the price, within the time, and upon the terms and conditions stated in the articles. When the articles permit a partial redemption of a class or series of shares, the articles must prescribe the method of selecting the shares to be redeemed. The method of selection may be

pro rata;

by lot;

at the discretion of, or in a manner approved by, the board; or

upon other terms and conditions stated in the articles.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

10.06.375

, a corporation may not issue redeemable shares unless the shares are redeemable as provided in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 12 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For the United States Investment Company Act of 1940, see
15 U.S.C. 80a-1 et seq.

Sec. 10.06.328.
Irrevocability of subscriptions for shares.

A subscription for shares of a corporation to be organized is irrevocable for a period of six months, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise or unless all of the subscribers consent to the revocation of the subscription.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.330.
Payment of subscription for shares.

Unless otherwise provided in the subscription agreement, subscriptions for shares, whether made before or after the organization of a corporation, shall be paid in full at the time or in installments as determined by the board. A call made by the board for payment on subscriptions shall be uniform for shares of the same class or shares of the same series.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.333.
Remedies for default in payment.

In case of default in the payment of an installment or call when payment is due, the corporation may proceed to collect the amount due as any debt due the corporation. The bylaws may prescribe other remedies for failure to pay installments or calls that become due. No remedy working a forfeiture of a subscription, or of the amounts paid on a subscription, may be declared against a subscriber unless the amount due remains unpaid for a period of 20 days after written demand has been made. If mailed, written demand is considered to be made when it is deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope addressed to the subscriber at the last post office address known to the corporation, with postage prepaid. On a sale of shares by reason of forfeiture, the excess of proceeds realized over the amount due and unpaid on the shares shall be paid to the delinquent subscriber or to the legal representative of the subscriber.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.335.
Consideration for shares.

Shares may be issued for consideration expressed in dollars fixed by the board unless the articles of incorporation reserve to the shareholders the right to fix the consideration. If this right is reserved as to any shares, the shareholders shall, before the issuance of the shares, fix the consideration to be received for the shares by approval of the outstanding shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.338.
Payment for shares.

Consideration for the issuance of shares may be paid, in whole or in part, in money, in other property, tangible or intangible, or in labor or services actually performed for the corporation. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, when payment of the consideration for shares is received by the corporation, the shares are considered fully paid and nonassessable.

A promissory note or future service does not constitute payment or part payment for shares of a corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.340.
Judgment of board or shareholders as to value of consideration.

In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the judgment of the board or the shareholders as to the value of the consideration received for shares is conclusive.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.343.
Share rights and options.

Subject to a provision in its articles, a corporation may create and issue, whether or not in connection with the issuance and sale of any of its shares or other securities, rights or options entitling the holders of the rights or options to purchase from the corporation shares of any class or classes. These rights or options shall be evidenced in the manner the board approves and, subject to the provisions of the articles, must set out the terms upon which, the time within which, and the price at which the shares may be purchased from the corporation upon the exercise of the right or option. If the rights or options are to be issued to directors, officers, or employees of the corporation or of a subsidiary of the corporation and not to the shareholders generally, their issuance shall be authorized by the approval of the outstanding shares or must be consistent with a plan so approved or ratified. In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the judgment of the board as to the adequacy of the consideration received for the rights or options is conclusive.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.345.
Expenses of organization, reorganization, and financing.

The reasonable charges and expenses of organization or reorganization of a corporation, and the reasonable expenses of and compensation for the sale or underwriting of its shares, may be paid or allowed by the corporation out of the consideration received by the corporation in payment for its shares without rendering the shares not fully paid or assessable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.348.
Certificates representing shares.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

10.06.349

, the shares of a corporation shall be represented by certificates signed by the president or vice-president and the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, and may be sealed with the seal of the corporation or a facsimile of the seal. The signatures of the president or vice-president and the secretary or assistant secretary upon a certificate may be facsimiles if the certificate is countersigned by a transfer agent or registered by a registrar, other than the corporation itself or an employee of the corporation. If an officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on the certificate ceases to be an officer before the certificate is issued, the certificate may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if the officer were an officer at the date of its issue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.349.
Shares without certificates.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may authorize the issuance without certificates of some or all of the corporation’s classes or series of shares. The authorization does not affect shares that are already represented by certificates until the certificates are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement giving the information required by AS

10.06.350

to be on certificates, and, if applicable, the information required by AS

10.06.424(c)

to be disclosed to the shareholder when there is no certificate.

History.

(§ 8 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.350.
Information required to be stated on certificate.

Each certificate representing shares issued by a corporation authorized to issue shares of more than one class shall set out on the face or back of the certificate, or state that the corporation will furnish to a shareholder upon request and without charge, a full or summary statement of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of the shares of each class authorized to be issued and, if the corporation is authorized to issue preferred or special class in series, the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series so far as they have been fixed and determined and the authority of the board to fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of subsequent series.

Each certificate representing shares shall state upon its face

that the corporation is organized under the laws of the state;

the name of the person to whom issued;

the number and class of shares, and the designation of the series, if any, that the certificate represents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.353.
Full payment required for share.

A share with or without a certificate may not be issued until the share is fully paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.355.
Issuance of fractional shares or scrip.

A corporation may issue a fractional share, and, by action of its board, may issue, instead of a fractional certificate, scrip in registered or bearer form that entitles the holder to receive a full share upon the surrender of the scrip aggregating a full share.

A fractional share entitles the holder to exercise voting rights, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation in the event of liquidation. Unless otherwise provided in the scrip, scrip does not entitle the holder to exercise voting rights, to receive dividends, or to participate in the assets of the corporation in the event of liquidation.

The board may issue scrip subject to the condition that it is void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date, or subject to the condition that the shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold by the corporation and the proceeds distributed to the holders of that scrip, or subject to other conditions that the board considers advisable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.356.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder.

The procedure may set out

the types of nominees to whom it applies;

the rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

the manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

the information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

the period when selection of the procedure is effective; and

other aspects of the rights and duties created.

History.

(§ 11 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.358.
Distributions; conditions; financial statements and determinations.

A corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation may not make a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders as defined in AS

10.06.990

unless

the amount of the retained earnings of the corporation immediately before the distribution equals or exceeds the amount of the proposed distribution; or

immediately after giving effect to the distribution the

sum of the assets of the corporation, exclusive of goodwill, capitalized research and development expenses, evidences of debts owing from directors or officers or secured by the corporation’s own shares, and deferred charges, would be at least equal to one and one-fourth times its liabilities, not including deferred taxes, deferred income, and other deferred credits; and

current assets of the corporation would be at least equal to its current liabilities or, if the average of the earnings of the corporation before taxes on income and before interest expense for the two preceding fiscal years was less than the average of the interest expense of the corporation for those fiscal years, at least equal to one and one-fourth its current liabilities.

For purposes of this section,

in determining the amount of the assets of the corporation, profits derived from an exchange of assets may not be included unless the assets received are currently realizable in cash;

“current assets” may include net amounts that the board has determined in good faith may reasonably be expected to be received from customers during the 12-month period used in calculating current liabilities under existing contractual relationships obligating the customers to make fixed or periodic payments during the term of the contracts after in each case giving effect to future costs not then included in current liabilities but reasonably expected to be incurred by the corporation in performing the contracts.

For the purposes of this chapter, the amount of a distribution payable in property shall be determined on the basis of the value at which the property is carried on the corporation’s financial statements in accordance with this section.

Only a corporation that classifies its assets as current assets and fixed assets in accordance with this section is governed by (a)(2)(B) of this section.

For the purposes of this section, the board of directors may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited either on financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles or on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are fair and reasonable in the circumstances.

Financial statements and determinations prepared or arrived at in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles are fair and reasonable. The fair and reasonable quality of statements and determinations prepared under other practices and principles shall be proved by the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.360.
Prohibited distribution; inability to meet maturing liabilities.

A corporation or subsidiary of a corporation may not make a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders if the corporation or the subsidiary making the distribution is, or as a result of the distribution would be, likely to be unable to meet its liabilities as they mature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.363.
Prohibited distribution on junior shares; liquidation preference.

A corporation or subsidiary of a corporation may not make a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders on any shares of its stock of a class or series that are junior to outstanding shares of another class or series with respect to distribution of assets on liquidation if, after giving effect to the distribution, the excess of its assets, exclusive of goodwill, capitalized research and development expenses, evidences of debts owing from directors or officers or secured by the corporation’s own shares, and deferred charges, over its liabilities, not including deferred taxes, deferred income and other deferred credits, would be less than the liquidation preference of all shares having a preference on liquidation over the class or series to which the distribution is made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.365.
Prohibited distribution on junior shares; relationship to retained earnings.

A corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation may not make a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders on any shares of its stock of a class or series that is junior to outstanding shares of another class or series with respect to payment of dividends unless the amount of the retained earnings of the corporation immediately before the distribution equals or exceeds the amount of the proposed distribution plus the aggregate amount of the cumulative dividends in arrears on all shares having a preference with respect to payment of dividends over the class or series to which the distribution is made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.368.
Exception for purchase or redemption of shares of deceased shareholder.

The provisions of AS

10.06.358

,

10.06.360

,

10.06.363

, and

10.06.365

do not apply to a purchase or redemption of shares of a deceased shareholder from the proceeds of insurance on the life of the shareholder in excess of the total amount of all premiums paid by the corporation for the insurance, in order to carry out the provisions of an agreement between the corporation and the shareholder to purchase or redeem the shares upon the death of the shareholder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.370.
Inapplicability to regulated investment company.

The provisions of AS

10.06.358

do not apply to a dividend declared by a regulated investment company, as defined in the United States Internal Revenue Code, to the extent that the dividend is necessary to maintain the status of the corporation as a regulated investment company under the provisions of that code. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a purchase or redemption of shares redeemable at the option of the holder by a registered open-end investment company under the United States Investment Company Act of 1940, so long as the right of redemption remains unsuspended under the provisions of that statute and the articles and bylaws of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For the United States Investment Act of 1940, see
15 U.S.C. 80a-1 et seq.

For United States Internal Revenue Service, see
26 U.S.C. 851.

Sec. 10.06.373.
Share dividends: restrictions.

A dividend payable in shares of a class may not be paid to the holders of shares of another class unless authorized by the articles of incorporation or unless payment is authorized by the affirmative vote or the written consent of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of the class in which the payment is to be made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.375.
Additional restrictions in articles, bylaws, indentures, or agreements.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits additional restrictions upon the declaration of dividends or the purchase or redemption of a corporation’s own shares by provision in the articles or bylaws of the corporation or in any indenture or other agreement entered into by the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.378.
Liability of shareholders receiving prohibited distributions; suit against shareholders.

A shareholder who receives a distribution prohibited by this chapter with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety of the distribution is liable to the corporation for the benefit of all of the creditors or shareholders entitled to institute an action under (b) of this section for the amount received by the shareholder with interest at the legal rate on judgments until paid. The liability of the shareholder under this subsection may not exceed the liabilities of the corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation and the injury suffered by nonconsenting shareholders.

Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability to

creditors arising under (a) of this section for a violation of AS

10.06.358

or

10.06.360

against any or all shareholders liable by any one or more creditors of the corporation whose debts or claims arose before the time of the distribution to shareholders and who have not consented to the distribution, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment; or

shareholders arising under (a) of this section for a violation of AS

10.06.363

or

10.06.365

against any or all shareholders liable by any one or more holders of preferred shares outstanding at the time of the distribution who have not consented to the distribution, without regard to the provisions of AS

10.06.435

.

A shareholder sued under this section may implead all other shareholders liable under this section and may compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against shareholders not joined in that action.

This section does not affect the liability that a shareholder may have under other applicable law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of (c) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 19, see sec. 16, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.380.
Identification of distribution in notice to shareholders.

A distribution other than one chargeable to retained earnings shall be identified in a notice to shareholders as being made from a source other than retained earnings, and shall include a statement of the accounting treatment of the distribution. The notice shall accompany the distribution or shall be given within three months after the end of the fiscal year in which the distribution is paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.383.
Inapplicability to winding up and involuntary or voluntary dissolution.

AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.390

do not apply in a proceeding for winding up and dissolution under AS

10.06.605

—

10.06.678

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.385.
Redemption of shares at the option of corporation; manner.

A corporation may redeem any or all shares that are redeemable at its option by

giving notice of redemption; and

payment or deposit of the redemption price of the shares as provided in its articles of incorporation or deposit of the redemption price in accordance with (d) of this section.

Subject to any provisions in its articles with respect to the notice required for redemption of shares, the corporation may give notice of the redemption of any or all shares subject to redemption by publishing a notice of redemption in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the principal executive office of the corporation is located at least once a week for two successive weeks, beginning not earlier than 60 nor later than 20 days before the date fixed for redemption. The notice of redemption must set out the following:

the class or series of shares or part of any class or series of shares to be redeemed;

the date fixed for redemption;

the redemption price; and

the place at which the shareholders may obtain payment of the redemption price upon surrender of their share certificates or uncertificated shares.

If the corporation gives notice of redemption under (b) of this section, it shall also mail a copy of the notice of redemption to each holder of record of shares to be redeemed as of the date of mailing or record date fixed in accordance with AS

10.06.408

, addressed to the holder at the address of the holder appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the holder to the corporation for the purpose of notice not earlier than 60 nor later than 20 days before the date fixed for redemption. Failure to comply with this subsection does not invalidate the redemption of the shares.

On or before the date fixed for redemption of redeemable shares, a corporation may deposit with a bank or trust company in this state as a trust fund a sum sufficient to redeem the shares called on the date fixed for redemption, with irrevocable instructions to the bank or trust company to publish a notice of redemption, or to complete the publication if begun, and to pay, on and after or before the date fixed for redemption, the redemption price of the shares to holders of the shares upon the surrender of their share certificates or uncertificated shares. From and after the date of the deposit with the bank or trust company, although before the date fixed for redemption, the shares called for redemption are redeemed and dividends on those shares cease to accrue after the date fixed for redemption. The deposit constitutes full payment of the shares to their holders and from and after the date of the deposit the shares are no longer outstanding and the holders of the shares cease to be shareholders with respect to the shares and have no rights with respect to the shares except the right to receive from the bank or trust company payment of the redemption price of the shares without interest upon surrender of the certificates for the shares or the uncertificated shares, and any right to convert the shares that may exist and continue for a period fixed by the terms of the shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 15, 16 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

The term “uncertificated” was substituted for “certificateless” in (b)(4) and (d) in this section in 1989 to conform to national usage.

Sec. 10.06.388.
Acquisition of corporation’s own shares; reissuance or retirement.

When a corporation purchases or redeems or otherwise acquires its own shares, the shares are restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares unless the articles prohibit their reissuance.

If the articles prohibit the reissuance of shares upon their acquisition by the corporation, then upon the acquisition of those shares the authorized number of shares of the class and series, if any, to which the shares belonged is reduced by the number of shares acquired and the articles shall be amended to reflect the reduction in authorized shares. If all of the authorized shares of a class or series are acquired and their reissue is prohibited by the articles of incorporation, then the articles shall also be amended to eliminate any statement of rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions relating solely to that class or series. Articles of amendment shall be filed within 60 days of the acquisition of the shares in accordance with the requirements of AS

10.06.512

—

10.06.514

. Approval by the outstanding shares is not required to adopt such articles of amendment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12(b), ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides:
“AS

10.06.388(a)

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, applies only to shares acquired on or after July 1, 1989.”

Sec. 10.06.390.
Capitalization of retained earnings.

The paid-in capital of a corporation may be increased by resolution of the board directing that all or a part of the retained earnings of the corporation be transferred to the paid-in capital account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)